Massachusetts, session 194th, S1943.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 64H of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the definition of “Retail establishment”,
the following definition:-
“Rolling stock”, trucks, tractors, and trailers, used by common carriers to transport goods
in interstate commerce.
SECTION 2. Section 6 of chapter 64H, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting,
after subsection (xx), the following new subsection:-
(yy) Sales of rolling stock.
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 64I, as so appearing, is amended by inserting in line 5,
after the words “retail establishment”, the following new words:- , “rolling stock”.
SECTION 4. Section 7 of chapter 64I, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting,
after subsection (e), the following new subsection:-
(f) Storage, use, or other consumption of rolling stock.
of 2